Tennessee, session 114, SB2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-17-109, is amended by deleting
"fifteen (15) days" and substituting "ten (10) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2046
011898
- 1 -